Utah statutes.
77-17-6.   Lottery tickets -- Evidence.
(1) On a trial for violation of any of the lottery provisions of the Utah
Criminal Code, it is not necessary to prove:
(a)  The existence of any lottery in which any lottery tickets shall purport
to have been issued;
(b)  The actual signing of any ticket or share, or pretended share of any
pretended lottery; or
(c)  That any lottery ticket, share or interest was signed or issued by the
authority of any manager, or of any person assuming to have authority as
manager.
(2)  In all cases, proof of the sale, furnishing, bartering or procuring of
any lottery ticket, share or interest therein, or of any instrument purporting
to be a ticket, or part or share of any ticket shall be evidence that the
share or interest was signed and issued according to its purport.
